Nebraska, session 109, LB737.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-6,122, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,122 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall, in
collaboration with the Department of Correctional Services, the Department of
Economic Development, the Department of Labor, the Department of
Transportation, the Department of Veterans' Affairs, the State Department of
Education, the University of Nebraska, and the Equal Opportunity Commission,
develop a comprehensive strategic plan for providing services to qualified
persons with disabilities in the most integrated community-based settings
pursuant to the Olmstead decision.
(2) The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human
Services shall convene a team to:
(a) Develop the strategic plan described in subsection (1) of this
section;
(b) Appoint and convene a stakeholder advisory committee to assist in the
review and development of the strategic plan, such committee members to include
a representative from the State Advisory Committee on Mental Health Services,
the Advisory Committee on Developmental Disabilities, the Nebraska Statewide
Independent Living Council, the Nebraska Planning Council on Developmental
Disabilities, the Division of Rehabilitation Services in the State Department
of Education, the Public Service Commission, the Commission for the Deaf and
Hard of Hearing, the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired, a housing
authority in a city of the first or second class and a housing authority in a
city of the primary or metropolitan class, the Assistive Technology
Partnership, the protection and advocacy system for Nebraska, an assisted-
living organization, the behavioral health regions, mental health
practitioners, developmental disability service providers, an organization that
advocates for persons with developmental disabilities, an organization that
advocates for persons with mental illness, an organization that advocates for
persons with brain injuries, and an area agency on aging, and including two
persons with disabilities representing self-advocacy organizations, and, at the
department’s discretion, other persons with expertise in programs serving
persons with disabilities;
(c) Arrange for consultation with an independent consultant to assist with
the continued analysis and revision of the strategic plan and determine whether
the benchmarks, deadlines, and timeframes are in substantial compliance with
the strategic plan;
(d) Provide continuing analysis of the strategic plan and a report on the
progress of the strategic plan and changes or revisions to the Legislature by
December 15, 2021, and every three years thereafter; and
(e) Provide the completed strategic plan to the Legislature and the
Governor by December 15, 2019.
(3) The reports and completed plan shall be submitted electronically to
the Legislature.
(4)(a) On or before October 1 of each year, the Health and Human Services
Committee of the Legislature and the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature
shall:
(i) Hold a joint public hearing to assess (A) the progress of the Olmstead
plan during the previous calendar year in the areas of housing, employment,
education, community supports, and transportation, and (B) potential
legislative solutions; and
(ii) Electronically submit a report of the findings to the Clerk of the
Legislature no later than December 31 of each year.
(b) Nothing in this subsection (4) shall be construed to require the
Department of Health and Human Services to provide the Health and Human
Services Committee of the Legislature and the Urban Affairs Committee of the
Legislature the report required by subdivision (2)(d) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-6,122, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-1-